Hawaii statutes.
§431M-1 Definitions. Whenever used in
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advanced practice registered nurse"
means a person licensed pursuant to chapter 457.

"Alcohol dependence" means any use of
alcohol which produces a pattern of pathological use causing impairment in
social or occupational functioning or produces physiological dependency
evidenced by physical tolerance or withdrawal.

"Alcohol or drug dependence outpatient
services" means alcohol or drug dependence nonresidential treatment
provided on an ambulatory basis to patients with alcohol or drug dependence
problems that includes interventions prescribed and performed by qualified
physicians, psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, marriage and
family therapists, licensed mental health [counselors], or advanced practice
registered nurses. This definition shall not imply a broadening of the scope
of or granting of prescriptive authority privileges, except as otherwise
allowed pursuant to chapter 457.

"Certified substance abuse counselor"
means a person who is certified pursuant to section 321-193.

"Day treatment services" means
treatment services provided by a hospital, mental health outpatient facility,
or nonhospital facility to patients who, because of their conditions, require
more than periodic hourly service. Day treatment services shall be prescribed
by a physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, marriage and
family therapist, licensed mental health counselor, or advanced practice
registered nurse, and carried out under the supervision of a physician,
psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist,
licensed mental health counselor, or advanced practice registered nurse. Day
treatment services require less than twenty-four hours of care and a minimum of
three hours in any one day.

"Detoxification services" means the
process whereby a person intoxicated by alcohol, drugs, or both, or a person
who is dependent upon alcohol, drugs, or both, is assisted through the period
of time necessary to eliminate, by metabolic or other means, the intoxicating
alcohol or drug dependency factors, as determined by a physician or advanced
practice registered nurse, while keeping the physiological risk to the person
at a minimum.

"Drug dependence" means any pattern
of pathological use of drugs causing impairment in social or occupational
functioning and producing psychological or physiological dependency or both,
evidenced by physical tolerance or withdrawal.

"Hospital" means a facility licensed
as a hospital by the department of health and accredited by the Joint
Commission on Accreditation of Health Care Organizations.

"In-hospital services" means the
provision of medical, nursing, or therapeutic services twenty-four hours a day
in a hospital.

"Licensed clinical social worker"
means a person who is a licensed clinical social worker pursuant to chapter
467E.

"Licensed mental health counselor"
means a person:

(1) Who engages in the practice of [mental] health
counseling and uses the title of licensed mental health counselor;

(2) Who is licensed in mental health counseling
practice pursuant to chapter 453D; and

(3) Whose license is in effect and not revoked or
suspended.

"Marriage and family therapist" means
a person licensed in marriage and family therapy practice pursuant to chapter
451J.

"Mental health outpatient facility"
means a mental health establishment, clinic, institution, center, or community
mental health center, that provides for the diagnosis, treatment, care, or rehabilitation
of mentally ill persons, that has been accredited by the Joint Commission on
Accreditation of Health Care Organizations or the Commission on Accreditation
of Rehabilitation Facilities or certified by the department of health.

"Mental health outpatient services"
means mental health nonresidential treatment provided on an ambulatory basis to
patients with mental illness that includes interventions prescribed and
performed by a physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, marriage
and family therapist, licensed mental health counselor, or advanced practice
registered nurse.

"Mental illness" means a syndrome of
clinically significant psychological, biological, or behavioral abnormalities
that results in personal distress or suffering, impairment of capacity for
functioning, or both. For the purposes of this chapter, the terms "mental
disorder" and "mental illness" shall be used interchangeably and
shall include the definitions identified in the most recent publications of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the American Psychiatric Association or
International Classification of Disease. Epilepsy, senility, intellectual
disability, or other developmental disabilities and addiction to or abuse of
intoxicating substances do not in and of themselves constitute a mental
disorder.

"Nonhospital facility" means a
facility for the care or treatment of alcohol dependent, drug dependent, or
mentally ill persons, which has been accredited by the Joint Commission on
Accreditation of Health Care Organizations or the Commission on Accreditation
of Rehabilitation Facilities or certified by the department of health and, if
residential, has been licensed as a special treatment facility by the
department of health.

"Nonhospital residential services" means
the provision of medical, psychological, nursing, counseling, or therapeutic
services to patients suffering from alcohol dependence, drug dependence, or
mental illness by a nonhospital residential facility, according to
individualized treatment plans.

"Partial hospitalization" means
treatment services, including in-hospital treatment services or benefits,
provided by a hospital or mental health outpatient facility to patients who,
because of their conditions, require more than periodic hourly service.
Partial hospitalization shall be prescribed by a physician or psychologist, and
may be prescribed by a licensed clinical social worker, marriage and family
therapist, licensed mental health counselor, or advanced practice registered
nurse in consultation with a physician or psychologist. Partial
hospitalization requires less than twenty-four hours of care and a minimum of
three hours in any one day.

"Physician" means a person licensed
in the practice of medicine or osteopathy pursuant to chapter 453.

"Psychologist" means a person
licensed in the practice of psychology pursuant to chapter 465.

"Qualified" means:

(1) Having skill in the diagnosis or treatment of
substance use disorders, based on a practitioner's credentials, including but
not limited to professional education, clinical training, licensure, board or
other certification, clinical experience, letters of reference, other
professional qualifications, and disciplinary action; or

(2) Being a licensed physician, psychologist,
licensed clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist, licensed mental
health counselor, or advanced practice registered nurse, and certified pursuant
to chapter 321.

"Substance abuse services" means the
provision of medical, psychological, nursing, counseling, or therapeutic
services in response to a treatment plan for alcohol or drug dependence or both
which shall include, when appropriate, a combination of aftercare and
individual, group, and family counseling services provided by qualified staff.

"Treatment episode" means one
admission to an accredited hospital or nonhospital facility, or office of a
qualified physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, marriage
and family therapist, licensed mental health counselor, or advanced practice registered
nurse for treatment of alcohol or drug dependence, or both, as stipulated in a
prescribed treatment plan and that would generally produce remission in those
who complete the treatment. The prescribed treatment plan may include the
provision of substance abuse services in more than one location and may include
in-hospital, nonhospital residential, day treatment, or alcohol or drug
dependence outpatient services, or any combination thereof. An admission for
only detoxification services shall not constitute a treatment episode. [L 1988,
c 202, pt of §1, §3; am L 1991, c 90, §1; am L 1994, c 111, §§1, 4; am L 1997,
c 247, §1 and c 273, §1; am L 1998, c 78, §3; am L 1999, c 36, §1, c 121, §§1,
6, and c 215, §1; am L 2000, c 243, §8(2); am L 2001, c 111, §§1, 2, 4; am L
2002, c 167, §3 and c 239, §1; am L 2003, c 197, §§2, 3; am L 2005, c 140, §1;
am L 2006, c 205, §2; am L 2007, c 38, §1; am L 2008, c 206, §2; am L 2009, c
11, §52; am L 2011, c 220, §12; am L 2015, c 35, §47 and c 63, §25]

Note

Definition of "partial hospitalization services"
changed to "partial hospitalization". L 2015, c 63, §25(1).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next